North Carolina, session 2025, HB1215.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 6.2 of the Charter of the Town of Garner, being Chapter 333
of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 6.2. Settlement of claims. The board of aldermen town council may authorize the town
manager to settle the following claims against involving the town for personal town:
(1) Personal injury or damage to property damage claims when the amount
involved does not exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) and does not exceed the actual loss sustained,
including loss of time, medical expenses, and any other expense actually
incurred.
(2) Eminent domain claims filed by the town when the amount involved does not
exceed the amount budgeted for property or easement acquisition for the
approved capital improvement project.
(3) Claims made by the town for debts owed to the town when the amount
involved does not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
All such settlements pursuant to this section shall be approved by the town attorney.attorney
and reported to the town council in a timely manner. Settlement of a claim by the town manager
pursuant to this section shall constitute a complete release of the town from all damages sustained
by a person involved in the settlement arising out of the same claim."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 2nd day of July, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
*H1215-v-4*